New Jersey, session 222, A3914.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Agriculture shall establish a pilot program to increase the consumption of whole foods in school cafeterias by providing school districts with breakfast and lunch prepared using whole food, to be known as the "NJ Whole Food" program.  The department shall operate the pilot program for two full consecutive school years. b.    In establishing the pilot program pursuant to this section, the department shall: (1)   identify no fewer than three school districts or charter schools in the State that the department considers to be appropriate for the pilot program; (2)   solicit appropriate vendors to participate in the program; (3)   hire additional staff as necessary to prepare breakfast and lunch using whole food; (4)   purchase any equipment necessary for the preparation of breakfast and lunch; and (5)   establish methods for measuring the health, learning, fiscal, and other benefits to students and school districts of using whole food in school breakfasts and lunches. c.     The department may enter into a contract with a caterer, distributor, or other appropriate entity in order to implement the provisions of the program. d.    No later than three years after the effective date of this act, the department shall submit a written report to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) summarizing the program established pursuant to this section, providing information on whether the program provided health and learning benefits to students and cost-savings to school districts, and providing recommendations for legislative action to increase the consumption of whole food in school cafeterias, including whether or not to make the program permanent. e.     For the purposes of this section, whole food means food that has been minimally processed or refined and is free from added sugar, additives, or other artificial substances. 2.    There is appropriated to the Department of Agriculture the sum of $1,000,000 from the General Fund in order to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately, and shall expire upon the submittal by the department of the report required pursuant to subsection d. of section 1 of this act.